Utah statutes.
9-6-201.   Division of Arts and Museums -- Creation -- Powers and duties.

(1)  There is created within the department the Division of Arts and Museums under the administration and general supervision of the executive director or the designee of the executive director.

(2)  The division shall be under the policy direction of the board.

(3)  The division shall advance the interests of the arts, in all their phases, within the state, and to that end shall:

(a)  cooperate with and locally sponsor federal agencies and projects directed to similar undertakings;

(b)  develop the influence of arts in education;

(c)  involve the private sector, including businesses, charitable interests, educational interests, manufacturers, agriculturalists, and industrialists in these endeavors;

(d)  utilize broadcasting facilities and the power of the press in disseminating information; and

(e)  foster, promote, encourage, and facilitate, not only a more general and lively study of the arts, but take all necessary and useful means to stimulate a more abundant production of an indigenous art in this state.

(4)  The board shall set policy to guide the division in accomplishing the purposes set forth in Subsection (3).

(5)  The division may not grant funds for the support of any arts project under this section unless the project has been first approved by the board.

(6) (a)  For a pass-through funding grant of at least $25,000, the division shall make quarterly disbursements to the pass-through funding grant recipient, contingent upon the division receiving a quarterly progress report from the pass-through grant recipient.

(b)  The division shall:

(i)  provide the pass-through grant recipient with a progress report form for the reporting purposes of Subsection (6)(a); and

(ii)  include reporting requirement instructions with the form.

